Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 277 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "light engine" means a locomotive operating without a
train behind it.
(2) A train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight shall not
be operated unless it has a crew consisting of at least two (2) individuals located
in the operating cab.
(3) The requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to a train or
light engine used in connection with the movement of freight when engaged in:
(a) The movement of a train or locomotive engine a short distance within a
railroad yard or mechanical facility;
(b) En route switching; or
(c) Any work that would require the train conductor to perform duties assigned
to his or her train.
Section 2. KRS 277.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any railroad company that violates or permits any of its agents or employees to
violate any of the provisions of KRS 277.110, subsection (1) of 277.160, 277.170,
277.180, 277.210, 277.230 or 277.300 shall, in addition to subjecting itself to any
damages that may be caused by such violation, be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, to be
recovered in the Franklin Circuit Court or in the circuit court of any county through
which the railroad operates a line of road.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (2) of KRS 277.160
shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than one hundred dollars
($100) for each offense.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/9/2024 3:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 826
(3) Any railroad company that violates, or permits any of its agents or employees to
violate, any of the provisions of KRS 277.190, shall, in addition to subjecting itself
to liability for any damage caused thereby, be fined not less than ten dollars ($10)
nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Prosecutions under this
subsection shall not be commenced after six (6) months from the commission of the
offense charged in the prosecution.
(4) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 277.250 shall be fined fifty
dollars ($50) or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.
(5) Any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within this state as a
common carrier of persons or property or both, for compensation, who either
operates for its employees, or who furnishes to its employees for their
transportation to or from the place or places where they are required to labor, a rail
track motor car that has not been fully equipped as required by KRS 277.245, shall
be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500) for each offense and each day or part of a day it operates or furnishes
each of such rail track motor cars not so equipped as provided in KRS 277.245 to
its employees for operation to or from the place or places where they are required to
work shall constitute a separate offense.
(6) Any railroad company that violates the provisions of KRS 277.200 shall be fined
not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for
each offense. If a grade crossing or drawbridge is obstructed by two (2) or more
trains stopping and standing thereon in succession without allowing accumulated
highway or water traffic to pass, the obstruction by each such successive train shall
constitute a separate offense.
(7) Any railroad company that willfully violates, or permits any of its agents or
employees to willfully violate, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall be fined
a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/9/2024 3:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 826
thousand dollars ($2,000) for the first offense, not less than five thousand dollars
($5,000) nor more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for the
second offense within a three (3) year period, and not less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the third
or subsequent offense within a three (3) year period. Civil penalties collected
under this subsection shall be distributed to the road fund.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/9/2024 3:55 PM Jacketed